Mississippi statutes. Title 87. Contracts and Contractual Relations
Chapter 9. General Provisions

§ 87-9-1.
Manufacturer’s taxes required to be paid under contract; alteration of timing; security.

When a contract calls for one (1) party to reimburse the other party for the federal manufacturer’s excise tax levied by 26 USCA4081 through 26 USCA4083, whether as a separate item or as part of the price, the party required to make the reimbursement may tender payment for the taxes one (1) business day before the time that the other party is required to remit the taxes to the United States Internal Revenue Service.

If a party elects to make payment as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the other party may demand security for the payment of the taxes in proportion to the amount the taxes represent compared to the security demanded on the contract as a whole. The other party may not change the other payment terms of the contract without a valid business reason other than the exercise of the option as provided in subsection (1) of this section, except to require the payment of the taxes under the option to be made by electronic transfer of funds.

The party exercising the option set out in subsection (1) of this section shall notify the other party in writing of the intent to exercise the payment option and the effective date of the exercise which shall not be earlier than thirty (30) days after the notice of intent is received or the beginning of the next federal tax quarter, whichever is later.

This section shall apply to all contracts now in effect which have no expiration date and are continuing contracts and to all other contracts entered into or renewed from and after July 1, 1994. Specifically, this section shall apply to contracts arising from daily wholesale price offers which are accepted or rejected by the acceptance or rejection of products at the stated prices. Each daily price offering shall be construed to be a new offer and each purchase of product at a given price offer to create a new contract to which this section shall apply. Any contract in force and effect on July 1, 1994, which, by its own terms, will terminate on a subsequent date, shall be governed by the law as it existed before July 1, 1994.

The option provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to impair the obligations arising under any contract executed before July 1, 1994. The exercise of an option as set out in subsection (1) of this section shall not relieve the party of the obligation to make the reimbursement as provided for in the contract but shall affect only the timing of when that reimbursement shall be tendered.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.